Nebraska, session 109, LB401.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB401 LB401
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 77-2708, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-2708 (1)(a) The sales and use taxes imposed by the Nebraska
Revenue Act of 1967 shall be due and payable to the Tax Commissioner
monthly on or before the twentieth day of the month next succeeding each
monthly period unless otherwise provided pursuant to the Nebraska Revenue
Act of 1967.
(b)(i) On or before the twentieth day of the month following each
monthly period or such other period as the Tax Commissioner may require,
a return for such period, along with all taxes due, shall be filed with
the Tax Commissioner in such form and content as the Tax Commissioner may
prescribe and containing such information as the Tax Commissioner deems
necessary for the proper administration of the Nebraska Revenue Act of
1967. The Tax Commissioner, if he or she deems it necessary in order to
insure payment to or facilitate the collection by the state of the amount
of sales or use taxes due, may require returns and payment of the amount
of such taxes for periods other than monthly periods in the case of a
particular seller, retailer, or purchaser, as the case may be. The Tax
Commissioner shall by rule and regulation require reports and tax
payments from sellers, retailers, or purchasers depending on their yearly
tax liability. Except as required by the streamlined sales and use tax
agreement, annual returns shall be required if such sellers', retailers',
or purchasers' yearly tax liability is less than nine hundred dollars,
quarterly returns shall be required if their yearly tax liability is nine
hundred dollars or more and less than three thousand dollars, and monthly
returns shall be required if their yearly tax liability is three thousand
dollars or more. The Tax Commissioner shall have the discretion to allow
an annual return for seasonal retailers, even when their yearly tax
liability exceeds the amounts listed in this subdivision.
The Tax Commissioner may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
to allow annual, semiannual, or quarterly returns for any retailer making
-2-

LB401 LB401
2025 2025
monthly remittances or payments of sales and use taxes by electronic
funds transfer or for any retailer remitting tax to the state pursuant to
the streamlined sales and use tax agreement. Such rules and regulations
may establish a method of determining the amount of the payment that will
result in substantially all of the tax liability being paid each quarter.
At least once each year, the difference between the amount paid and the
amount due shall be reconciled. If the difference is more than ten
percent of the amount paid, a penalty of fifty percent of the unpaid
amount shall be imposed.
(ii) For purposes of the sales tax, a return shall be filed by every
retailer liable for collection from a purchaser and payment to the state
of the tax, except that a combined sales tax return may be filed for all
licensed locations which are subject to common ownership. For purposes of
this subdivision, common ownership means the same person or persons own
eighty percent or more of each licensed location. For purposes of the use
tax, a return shall be filed by every retailer engaged in business in
this state and by every person who has purchased property, the storage,
use, or other consumption of which is subject to the use tax, but who has
not paid the use tax due to a retailer required to collect the tax.
(iii) The Tax Commissioner may require that returns be signed by the
person required to file the return or by his or her duly authorized agent
but need not be verified by oath.
(iv) A taxpayer who keeps his or her regular books and records on a
cash basis, an accrual basis, or any generally recognized accounting
basis which correctly reflects the operation of the business may file the
sales and use tax returns required by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 on
the same accounting basis that is used for the regular books and records,
except that on credit, conditional, and installment sales, the retailer
who keeps his or her books on an accrual basis may report such sales on
the cash basis and pay the tax upon the collections made during each
month. If a taxpayer transfers, sells, assigns, or otherwise disposes of
-3-

LB401 LB401
2025 2025
an account receivable, he or she shall be deemed to have received the
full balance of the consideration for the original sale and shall be
liable for the remittance of the sales tax on the balance of the total
sale price not previously reported, except that such transfer, sale,
assignment, or other disposition of an account receivable by a retailer
to a subsidiary shall not be deemed to require the retailer to pay the
sales tax on the credit sale represented by the account transferred prior
to the time the customer makes payment on such account. If the subsidiary
does not obtain a Nebraska sales tax permit, the taxpayer shall obtain a
surety bond in favor of the State of Nebraska to insure payment of the
tax and any interest and penalty imposed thereon under this section in an
amount not less than two times the amount of tax payable on outstanding
accounts receivable held by the subsidiary as of the end of the prior
calendar year. Failure to obtain either a sales tax permit or a surety
bond in accordance with this section shall result in the payment on the
next required filing date of all sales taxes not previously remitted.
When the retailer has adopted one basis or the other of reporting credit,
conditional, or installment sales and paying the tax thereon, he or she
will not be permitted to change from that basis without first having
notified the Tax Commissioner.
(c) Except as provided in the streamlined sales and use tax
agreement, the taxpayer required to file the return shall deliver or mail
any required return together with a remittance of the net amount of the
tax due to the office of the Tax Commissioner on or before the required
filing date. Failure to file the return, filing after the required filing
date, failure to remit the net amount of the tax due, or remitting the
net amount of the tax due after the required filing date shall be cause
for a penalty, in addition to interest, of ten percent of the amount of
tax not paid by the required filing date or twenty-five dollars,
whichever is greater, unless the penalty is being collected under
subdivision (1)(i), (1)(j)(i), or (1)(k)(i) of section 77-2703 by a
-4-

LB401 LB401
2025 2025
county treasurer or the Department of Motor Vehicles, in which case the
penalty shall be five dollars.
(d) The taxpayer shall deduct and withhold, from the taxes otherwise
due from him or her on his or her tax return, three percent of the first
five thousand dollars remitted each month to reimburse himself or herself
for the cost of collecting the tax. Taxpayers filing a combined return as
allowed by subdivision (1)(b)(ii) of this subsection shall compute such
collection fees on the basis of the receipts and liability of each
licensed location.
(e) A retailer that makes sales into Nebraska using a multivendor
marketplace platform is relieved of its obligation to collect and remit
sales taxes to Nebraska with regard to any sales taxes collected and
remitted by the multivendor marketplace platform. Such a retailer must
include all sales into Nebraska in its gross receipts in its return, but
may claim credit for any sales taxes collected and remitted by the
multivendor marketplace platform with respect to such retailer's sales.
Such retailer is liable for the sales tax due on sales into Nebraska as
provided in section 77-2704.35.
(f) A multivendor marketplace platform is relieved of its obligation
to collect and remit the correct amount of state and local sales taxes to
Nebraska to the extent that the multivendor marketplace platform can
establish that the error was due to insufficient or incorrect information
given to the multivendor marketplace platform by the seller and relied on
by the multivendor marketplace platform. This subdivision shall not apply
if the multivendor marketplace platform and the seller are related
persons under either section 267(b) or (c) or section 707(b) of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986 or if the seller is also the multivendor
marketplace platform operator.
(2)(a) If the Tax Commissioner determines that any sales or use tax
amount, penalty, or interest has been paid more than once, has been
erroneously or illegally collected or computed, or has been paid and the
-5-

LB401 LB401
2025 2025
purchaser qualifies for a refund under section 77-2708.01, the Tax
Commissioner shall set forth that fact in his or her records and the
excess amount collected or paid may be credited on any sales, use, or
income tax amounts then due and payable from the person under the
Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967. Any balance may be refunded to the person
by whom it was paid or his or her successors, administrators, or
executors.
(b) No refund shall be allowed unless a claim therefor is filed with
the Tax Commissioner by the person who made the overpayment or his or her
attorney, executor, or administrator within three years from the required
filing date following the close of the period for which the overpayment
was made, within six months after any determination becomes final under
section 77-2709, or within six months from the date of overpayment with
respect to such determinations, whichever of these three periods expires
later, unless the credit relates to a period for which a waiver has been
given. Failure to file a claim within the time prescribed in this
subsection shall constitute a waiver of any demand against the state on
account of overpayment.
(c) Every claim shall be in writing on forms prescribed by the Tax
Commissioner and shall state the specific amount and grounds upon which
the claim is founded. No refund shall be made in any amount less than two
dollars.
(d) The Tax Commissioner shall allow or disallow a claim within one
hundred eighty days after it has been filed. A request for a hearing
shall constitute a waiver of the one-hundred-eighty-day period. The
claimant and the Tax Commissioner may also agree to extend the one-
hundred-eighty-day period. If a hearing has not been requested and the
Tax Commissioner has neither allowed nor disallowed a claim within either
the one hundred eighty days or the period agreed to by the claimant and
the Tax Commissioner, the claim shall be deemed to have been allowed.
(e) Within thirty days after disallowing any claim in whole or in
-6-

LB401 LB401
2025 2025
part, the Tax Commissioner shall serve notice of his or her action on the
claimant in the manner prescribed for service of notice of a deficiency
determination. The notice shall include a written statement containing
the details of the facts, circumstances, and reasons the Tax Commissioner
used to determine that the claimant did not make an overpayment.
(f) Within thirty days after the mailing of the notice of the Tax
Commissioner's action upon a claim filed pursuant to the Nebraska Revenue
Act of 1967, the action of the Tax Commissioner shall be final unless the
taxpayer seeks review of the Tax Commissioner's determination as provided
in section 77-27,127.
(g) Upon the allowance of a credit or refund of any sum erroneously
or illegally assessed or collected, of any penalty collected without
authority, or of any sum which was excessive or in any manner wrongfully
collected, interest shall be allowed and paid on the amount of such
credit or refund at the rate specified in section 45-104.02, as such rate
may from time to time be adjusted, from the date such sum was paid or
from the date the return was required to be filed, whichever date is
later, to the date of the allowance of the refund or, in the case of a
credit, to the due date of the amount against which the credit is
allowed, but in the case of a voluntary and unrequested payment in excess
of actual tax liability or a refund under section 77-2708.01, no interest
shall be allowed when such excess is refunded or credited.
(h) No suit or proceeding shall be maintained in any court for the
recovery of any amount alleged to have been erroneously or illegally
determined or collected unless a claim for refund or credit has been duly
filed.
(i) The Tax Commissioner may recover any refund or part thereof
which is erroneously made and any credit or part thereof which is
erroneously allowed by issuing a deficiency determination within one year
from the date of refund or credit or within the period otherwise allowed
for issuing a deficiency determination, whichever expires later.
-7-

LB401 LB401
2025 2025
(j)(i) Credit shall be allowed to the retailer, contractor, or
repairperson for sales or use taxes paid pursuant to the Nebraska Revenue
Act of 1967 on any deduction taken that is attributed to bad debts not
including interest. Bad debt has the same meaning as in 26 U.S.C. 166, as
such section existed on January 1, 2003. However, the amount calculated
pursuant to 26 U.S.C. 166 shall be adjusted to exclude: Financing charges
or interest; sales or use taxes charged on the purchase price;
uncollectible amounts on property that remains in the possession of the
seller until the full purchase price is paid; and expenses incurred in
attempting to collect any debt and repossessed property.
(ii) Bad debts may be deducted on the return for the period during
which the bad debt is written off as uncollectible in the claimant's
books and records and is eligible to be deducted for federal income tax
purposes. A claimant who is not required to file federal income tax
returns may deduct a bad debt on a return filed for the period in which
the bad debt is written off as uncollectible in the claimant's books and
records and would be eligible for a bad debt deduction for federal income
tax purposes if the claimant was required to file a federal income tax
return.
(iii) If a deduction is taken for a bad debt and the debt is
subsequently collected in whole or in part, the tax on the amount so
collected must be paid and reported on the return filed for the period in
which the collection is made.
(iv) When the amount of bad debt exceeds the amount of taxable sales
for the period during which the bad debt is written off, a refund claim
may be filed within the otherwise applicable statute of limitations for
refund claims. The statute of limitations shall be measured from the due
date of the return on which the bad debt could first be claimed.
(v) If filing responsibilities have been assumed by a certified
service provider, the service provider may claim, on behalf of the
retailer, any bad debt allowance provided by this section. The certified
-8-

LB401 LB401
2025 2025
service provider shall credit or refund the full amount of any bad debt
allowance or refund received to the retailer.
(vi) For purposes of reporting a payment received on a previously
claimed bad debt, any payments made on a debt or account are applied
first proportionally to the taxable price of the property or service and
the sales tax thereon, and secondly to interest, service charges, and any
other charges.
(vii) In situations in which the books and records of the party
claiming the bad debt allowance support an allocation of the bad debts
among the member states in the streamlined sales and use tax agreement,
the state shall permit the allocation.
(3) Beginning July 1, 2020, if a refund claim under this section
involves a refund of a tax imposed under the Local Option Revenue Act or
section 13-319, 13-2813, or 77-6403 and the amount of such tax to be
refunded is at least five thousand dollars, the Tax Commissioner shall
notify the affected city, village, county, or municipal county of such
claim within twenty days after receiving the claim. If the Tax
Commissioner allows the claim and the refund of such tax is at least five
thousand dollars, the Tax Commissioner shall notify the affected city,
village, county, or municipal county of such refund and shall give the
city, village, county, or municipal county the option of having such
refund deducted from its tax proceeds in one lump sum or in twelve equal
monthly installments. The city, village, county, or municipal county
shall make its selection and shall certify the selection to the Tax
Commissioner within twenty days after receiving notice of the refund. The
Tax Commissioner shall then deduct such refund from the applicable tax
proceeds in accordance with the selection when he or she deducts refunds
pursuant to section 13-324, 13-2814, or 77-6403 or subsection (1) of
section 77-27,144, whichever is applicable. This subsection shall not
apply to any refund that is subject to subdivision (2)(a) or (2)(b)(ii)
or subsection (3) or (4) of section 77-27,144.
-9-

LB401 LB401
2025 2025
Sec. 2. Section 77-2709, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-2709 (1) If the Tax Commissioner is not satisfied with the return
or returns of the tax or the amount of tax required to be paid to the
state by any person, he or she may compute and determine the amount
required to be paid upon the basis of the facts contained in the return
or returns or upon the basis of any information within his or her
possession or which may come into his or her possession. One or more
deficiency determinations of the amount due for one or more than one
period may be made. To the amount of the deficiency determination for
each period shall be added a penalty equal to ten percent thereof or
twenty-five dollars, whichever is greater. In making a determination, the
Tax Commissioner may offset overpayments for a period or periods,
together with interest on the overpayments, against underpayments for
other period or periods, against penalties, and against the interest on
the underpayments.
The interest on underpayments and overpayments shall be computed in
the manner set forth hereinafter.
(2) If any person fails to make a return, the Tax Commissioner shall
make an estimate of the amount of the gross receipts of the person or, as
the case may be, of the amount of the total sales, rent, or lease price
of property sold, rented, or leased or purchased, by the person, the
storage, use, or consumption of which in this state is subject to the use
tax. The estimate shall be made for the period or periods in respect to
which the person failed to make a return and shall be based upon any
information which is in the Tax Commissioner's possession or may come
into his or her possession. Upon the basis of this estimate, the Tax
Commissioner shall compute and determine the amount required to be paid
to the state, adding to the sum thus arrived at a penalty equal to ten
percent thereof or twenty-five dollars, whichever is greater. One or more
determinations may be made for one or more than one period.
-10-

LB401 LB401
2025 2025
(3) The amount of the determination of any deficiency exclusive of
penalties shall bear interest at the rate specified in section 45-104.02,
as such rate may from time to time be adjusted, from the twentieth of the
month following the period for which the amount should have been returned
until the date of payment.
(4) If any part of a deficiency for which a deficiency determination
is made is the result of fraud or an intent to evade the Nebraska Revenue
Act of 1967 or authorized rules and regulations, a penalty of twenty-five
percent of the amount of the determination or fifty dollars, whichever is
greater, shall be added thereto.
(5)(a) Promptly after making his or her determination, the Tax
Commissioner shall give to the person written notice of his or her
determination that includes a written statement containing the details of
the facts, circumstances, and reasons the Tax Commissioner used to
determine that the return or returns of the tax or the amount of tax
required to be paid to the state by the person are not satisfactory.
(b) The notice may be served personally or by mail, and if by mail
the notice shall be addressed to the person at his or her address as it
appears in the records of the Tax Commissioner. In case of service by
mail of any notice required by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, the
service is complete at the time of deposit in the United States post
office.
(c) Every notice of a deficiency determination shall be personally
served or mailed within three years after the last day of the calendar
month following the period for which the amount is proposed to be
determined or within three years after the return is filed, whichever
period expires the later. In the case of a person failing to make a
return, filing a false or fraudulent return with the intent to evade the
sales or use tax, or omitting from a return an amount properly includable
therein which is in excess of twenty-five percent of the amount of tax
stated in the return, every notice of determination shall be mailed or
-11-

LB401 LB401
2025 2025
personally served within six years after the last day of the calendar
month following the period for which the amount is proposed to be
determined.
(d) When, before the expiration of the time prescribed in this
section for the mailing of a notice of deficiency determination, both the
Tax Commissioner and the taxpayer have consented in writing to its
mailing after such time, the notice of the deficiency determination may
be mailed at any time prior to the expiration of the period agreed upon.
The agreed-upon period may be extended by subsequent agreement, in
writing, made before the expiration of the period previously agreed upon.
(6) When a business is discontinued, a determination may be made at
any time thereafter within the periods specified in this section as to
liability arising out of that business, irrespective of whether the
determination is issued prior to the due date of the liability as
otherwise specified in the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967.
(7) Any person against whom a determination is made under
subsections (1) and (2) of this section or any person directly interested
may petition for a redetermination within sixty days after service upon
the person of notice thereof. For the purposes of this subsection, a
person is directly interested in a deficiency determination when such
deficiency could be collected from such person. If a petition for
redetermination is not filed within the sixty-day period, the
determination becomes final at the expiration of the period.
(8) If a petition for redetermination is filed within the sixty-day
period, the Tax Commissioner shall reconsider the determination and, if
the person has so requested in his or her petition, shall grant the
person an oral hearing and shall give him or her ten days' notice of the
time and place of the hearing. The Tax Commissioner may continue the
hearing from time to time as may be necessary.
(9) The Tax Commissioner may decrease or increase the amount of the
determination before it becomes final, but the amount may be increased
-12-

LB401 LB401
2025 2025
only if a claim for the increase is asserted by the Tax Commissioner at
or before the hearing, upon which assertion the petitioner shall be
entitled to a thirty-day continuance of the hearing to allow him or her
to obtain and produce further evidence applicable to the items upon which
the increase is based.
(10) The order or decision of the Tax Commissioner upon a petition
for redetermination shall become final thirty days after service upon the
petitioner of notice thereof.
(11) All determinations made by the Tax Commissioner under the
provisions of subsections (1) and (2) of this section are due and payable
at the time they become final. If they are not paid when due and payable,
a penalty of ten percent of the amount of the determination, exclusive of
interest and penalties, shall be added thereto.
(12) Any notice required by this section shall be served personally
or by mail in the manner prescribed in subsection (5) of this section.
Sec. 3. Section 77-2727, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-2727 (1) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section and
subsection (5) of section 77-2775, a partnership as such shall not be
subject to the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967.
Persons or their authorized representatives carrying on business as
partners shall be liable for the income tax imposed by the Nebraska
Revenue Act of 1967 only in their separate or individual capacities.
(2) The partners of such partnership who are residents of this state
or corporations shall include in their incomes their proportionate share
of such partnership's income.
(3) If any partner of such partnership is a nonresident individual
during any part of the partnership's reporting year, he or she shall file
a Nebraska income tax return which shall include in Nebraska adjusted
gross income that portion of the partnership's Nebraska income, as
determined under the provisions of sections 77-2728 and 77-2729,
-13-

LB401 LB401
2025 2025
allocable to his or her interest in the partnership and shall execute and
forward to the partnership, on or before the original due date of the
Nebraska partnership return, an agreement which states that he or she
will file a Nebraska income tax return and pay income tax on all income
derived from or attributable to sources in this state, and such agreement
shall be attached to the partnership's Nebraska return for such reporting
year.
(4)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c) of this subsection, in
the absence of the nonresident individual partner's executed agreement
being attached to the Nebraska partnership return, the partnership shall
remit a portion of such partner's income which was derived from or
attributable to Nebraska sources with its Nebraska return for the
reporting year. For tax years beginning or deemed to begin before January
1, 2013, the amount of remittance, in such instance, shall be the highest
individual income tax rate determined under section 77-2715.02 multiplied
by the nonresident individual partner's share of the partnership income
which was derived from or attributable to sources within this state. For
tax years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1, 2013, the
amount of remittance, in such instance, shall be the highest individual
income tax rate determined under section 77-2715.03 multiplied by the
nonresident individual partner's share of the partnership income which
was derived from or attributable to sources within this state.
(b) Any amount remitted on behalf of any partner shall be allowed as
a credit against the Nebraska income tax liability of the partner.
(c) Subdivision (a) of this subsection does not apply to a publicly
traded partnership as defined by section 7704(b) of the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended, that is treated as a partnership for the
purposes of the code and that has agreed to file an annual information
return with the Department of Revenue reporting the name, address,
taxpayer identification number, and other information requested by the
department of each unit holder with an income in the state in excess of
-14-

LB401 LB401
2025 2025
five hundred dollars.
(5) The Tax Commissioner may allow a nonresident individual partner
to not file a Nebraska income tax return if the nonresident individual
partner's only source of Nebraska income was his or her share of the
partnership's income which was derived from or attributable to sources
within this state, the nonresident did not file an agreement to file a
Nebraska income tax return, and the partnership has remitted the amount
required by subsection (4) of this section on behalf of such nonresident
individual partner. The amount remitted shall be retained in satisfaction
of the Nebraska income tax liability of the nonresident individual
partner.
(6) Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary:
(a) For tax years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January
1, 2018, a partnership may annually make an irrevocable election to pay
the taxes, interest, or penalties levied by the Nebraska Revenue Act of
1967 at the entity level for the taxable period covered by such return.
For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2023, such election may be
made on the applicable income tax return and shall must be made on or
before the due date for filing the applicable income tax return,
including any extensions that have been granted;
(b) An electing partnership with respect to a taxable period shall
pay an income tax equivalent to the highest individual income tax rate
provided in section 77-2715.03 multiplied by the electing partnership's
net income as apportioned or allocated to this state in accordance with
the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, for such taxable period;
(c) An electing partnership shall be treated as a corporation with
respect to the requirements of section 77-2769 for payments of estimated
tax. The requirement for payment of estimated tax under section 77-2769
shall not apply for tax years beginning prior to January 1, 2024.
Payments of estimated tax made by an eligible partnership that does not
make an election under this subsection shall be treated as income tax
-15-

LB401 LB401
2025 2025
withholding on behalf of the partners;
(d) Except as provided in subdivision (e) of this subsection, the
partners of an electing partnership shall must file a Nebraska return to
report their pro rata or distributive share of the income of the electing
partnership in accordance with the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, as
applicable. In determining the sum of its pro rata or distributive share
and computing the tax under this subsection, an electing partnership
shall add back any amount of Nebraska income tax imposed under the
Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 and deducted by the electing partnership for
federal income tax purposes under section 164 of the Internal Revenue
Code;
(e) A nonresident individual who is a partner of an electing
partnership shall not be required to file a Nebraska tax return for a
taxable year if, for such taxable year, the only source of income derived
from or connected with sources within this state for such partner, or for
the partner and the partner's spouse if a joint federal income tax return
is filed, is from one or more electing partnerships or electing small
business corporations as defined in subdivision (9)(a) of section
77-2734.01 for such taxable year and such nonresident individual
partner's tax under the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 would be fully
satisfied by the credit allowed to such partner under subdivision (g) of
this subsection;
(f) If the amount calculated under subdivision (a) of this
subsection results in a net operating loss, such net operating loss may
not be carried forward to succeeding taxable years;
(g)(i) A refundable credit shall be available to the partners in an
amount equal to their pro rata or distributive share of the Nebraska
income tax paid by the electing partnership. For tax returns filed for
taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1, 2022,
such credit shall be allowed for the same taxable year for which the
election is made, without regard to the year in which the tax is paid to
-16-

LB401 LB401
2025 2025
Nebraska or deducted on a federal income tax return;
(ii) In the case of a partnership or small business corporation that
is a partner of an electing partnership, the refundable credit under this
subdivision (g) shall (A) be allowed to its partners or shareholders in
accordance with the determination of income and distributive share of the
Nebraska income tax paid by the electing partnership or (B) be applied
against the partner's tax, interest, and penalty. Any excess credit
deemed an overpayment may be refunded or applied to the subsequent tax
year;
(iii) If a partnership making the election under this subsection is
a partner of another electing partnership, net income shall be computed
as provided in subsection (1) of this section. The upper tier electing
partnership shall claim a credit for the tax paid by the lower tier
electing partnership. The upper tier electing partnership shall
distribute out the pro rata or distributive share of the credits to its
partners for tax paid under this subsection by all tiers of electing
partnerships. As used in this subdivision, the term lower tier electing
partnership means an electing partnership in which some or all of the
partners are an electing partnership. The term upper tier electing
partnership means an electing partnership that is a partner of a lower
tier electing partnership. An electing partnership may have two or more
tiers; and
(h)(i) For tax years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2018, but prior to January 1, 2023, the electing partnership
shall must make the election under this subsection on or after January 1,
2023, but before December 31, 2025, in the form and manner prescribed by
the Tax Commissioner for all years for which the election under this
subsection is made on behalf of the electing partnership. The Tax
Commissioner shall establish the form and manner, which shall not include
any changes to the past returns other than those that are directly
related to the election under this subsection.
-17-

LB401 LB401
2025 2025
(ii) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if an electing
partnership files in the form and manner as specified in subdivision (h)
(i) of this subsection, the deadline for filing a claim for credit or
refund prescribed in section 77-2793 shall be extended for affected
partners of the electing partnership until the timeframe specified in
section 77-2793 or January 31, 2026, whichever is later. The resulting
claim of refund for tax years beginning prior to January 1, 2023, shall
be submitted in the form and manner as prescribed by the Tax
Commissioner. Neither the electing partnership nor its partners shall
incur any penalties for late filing nor owe interest on such amounts. The
Tax Commissioner shall not be required to pay interest on any amounts
owed to the partners resulting from such refund claims.
(iii) Notwithstanding the dates provided in subdivision (h)(i) of
this subsection, the Tax Commissioner shall have one year from the date
an electing partnership files in the form and manner as specified in
subdivision (h)(i) of this subsection to review and make a written
proposed deficiency determination in accordance with section 77-2786. Any
notice of deficiency determination made as specified in this subdivision
may be enforced at any time within six years from the date of the notice
of deficiency determination.
(7) For purposes of this section:
(a) Electing partnership means, with respect to a taxable period, an
eligible partnership that has made an election pursuant to subsection (6)
of this section with respect to such taxable period; and
(b) Eligible partnership means any partnership as provided for in
section 7701(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code that has a filing
requirement under the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 other than a publicly
traded partnership as defined in section 7704 of the Internal Revenue
Code. An eligible partnership includes any entity, including a limited
liability company, treated as a partnership for federal income tax
purposes that otherwise meets the requirements of this subdivision.
-18-

LB401 LB401
2025 2025
(8) For purposes of this section, any partner that is a grantor
trust of a nonresident shall be disregarded and this section shall apply
as though the nonresident grantor was the partner.
Sec. 4. Section 77-2734.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-2734.01 (1) Residents of Nebraska who are shareholders of a small
business corporation having an election in effect under subchapter S of
the Internal Revenue Code or who are members of a limited liability
company organized pursuant to the Nebraska Uniform Limited Liability
Company Act shall include in their Nebraska taxable income, to the extent
includable in federal gross income, their proportionate share of such
corporation's or limited liability company's federal income adjusted
pursuant to this section. Income or loss from such corporation or limited
liability company conducting a business, trade, profession, or occupation
shall be included in the Nebraska taxable income of a shareholder or
member who is a resident of this state to the extent of such
shareholder's or member's proportionate share of the net income or loss
from the conduct of such business, trade, profession, or occupation
within this state, determined under subsection (2) of this section. A
resident of Nebraska shall include in Nebraska taxable income fair
compensation for services rendered to such corporation or limited
liability company. Compensation actually paid shall be presumed to be
fair unless it is apparent to the Tax Commissioner that such compensation
is materially different from fair value for the services rendered or has
been manipulated for tax avoidance purposes.
(2) The income of any small business corporation having an election
in effect under subchapter S of the Internal Revenue Code or limited
liability company organized pursuant to the Nebraska Uniform Limited
Liability Company Act that is derived from or connected with Nebraska
sources shall be determined in the following manner:
(a) If the small business corporation is a member of a unitary
-19-

LB401 LB401
2025 2025
group, the small business corporation shall be deemed to be doing
business within this state if any part of its income is derived from
transactions with other members of the unitary group doing business
within this state, and such corporation shall apportion its income by
using the apportionment factor determined for the entire unitary group,
including the small business corporation, under sections 77-2734.05 to
77-2734.15;
(b) If the small business corporation or limited liability company
is not a member of a unitary group and is subject to tax in another
state, it shall apportion its income under sections 77-2734.05 to
77-2734.15; and
(c) If the small business corporation or limited liability company
is not subject to tax in another state, all of its income is derived from
or connected with Nebraska sources.
(3) Nonresidents of Nebraska who are shareholders of such
corporations or members of such limited liability companies shall file a
Nebraska income tax return and shall include in Nebraska adjusted gross
income their proportionate share of the corporation's or limited
liability company's Nebraska income as determined under subsection (2) of
this section.
(4) The nonresident shareholder or member shall execute and forward
to the corporation or limited liability company before the filing of the
corporation's or limited liability company's return an agreement which
states he or she will file a Nebraska income tax return and pay the tax
on the income derived from or connected with sources in this state, and
such agreement shall be attached to the corporation's or limited
liability company's Nebraska return for such taxable year.
(5) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin before January 1,
2013, in the absence of the nonresident shareholder's or member's
executed agreement being attached to the Nebraska return, the corporation
or limited liability company shall remit with the return an amount equal
-20-

LB401 LB401
2025 2025
to the highest individual income tax rate determined under section
77-2715.02 multiplied by the nonresident shareholder's or member's share
of the corporation's or limited liability company's income which was
derived from or attributable to this state. For taxable years beginning
or deemed to begin on or after January 1, 2013, in the absence of the
nonresident shareholder's or member's executed agreement being attached
to the Nebraska return, the corporation or limited liability company
shall remit with the return an amount equal to the highest individual
income tax rate determined under section 77-2715.03 multiplied by the
nonresident shareholder's or member's share of the corporation's or
limited liability company's income which was derived from or attributable
to this state. The amount remitted shall be allowed as a credit against
the Nebraska income tax liability of the shareholder or member.
(6) The Tax Commissioner may allow a nonresident individual
shareholder or member to not file a Nebraska income tax return if the
nonresident individual shareholder's or member's only source of Nebraska
income was his or her share of the small business corporation's or
limited liability company's income which was derived from or attributable
to sources within this state, the nonresident did not file an agreement
to file a Nebraska income tax return, and the small business corporation
or limited liability company has remitted the amount required by
subsection (5) of this section on behalf of such nonresident individual
shareholder or member. The amount remitted shall be retained in
satisfaction of the Nebraska income tax liability of the nonresident
individual shareholder or member.
(7) A small business corporation or limited liability company return
shall be filed if the small business corporation or limited liability
company has income derived from Nebraska sources.
(8) Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary:
(a) For tax years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January
1, 2018, a small business corporation may annually make an irrevocable
-21-

LB401 LB401
2025 2025
election to pay the taxes, interest, or penalties levied by the Nebraska
Revenue Act of 1967 at the entity level for the taxable period covered by
such return. For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2023, such
election may be made on the applicable income tax return and shall must
be made on or before the due date for filing the applicable income tax
return, including any extensions that have been granted;
(b) An electing small business corporation with respect to a taxable
period shall pay an income tax equivalent to the highest individual
income tax rate provided in section 77-2715.03 multiplied by the electing
small business corporation's net income as apportioned or allocated to
this state in accordance with the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, for such
taxable period;
(c) An electing small business corporation shall be treated as a
corporation with respect to the requirements of section 77-2769 for
payments of estimated tax. The requirement for payment of estimated tax
under section 77-2769 shall not apply for tax years beginning prior to
January 1, 2024. Payments of estimated tax made by an eligible small
business corporation that does not make an election under this subsection
shall be treated as income tax withholding on behalf of the shareholders;
(d) Except as provided in subdivision (e) of this subsection, the
shareholders of an electing small business corporation shall must file a
Nebraska return to report their pro rata or distributive share of the
income of the electing small business corporation in accordance with the
Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, as applicable. In determining the sum of
its pro rata or distributive share and computing the tax under this
subsection, an electing small business corporation shall add back any
amount of Nebraska income tax imposed under the Nebraska Revenue Act of
1967 and deducted by the electing small business corporation for federal
income tax purposes under section 164 of the Internal Revenue Code;
(e) A nonresident individual who is a shareholder of an electing
small business corporation shall not be required to file a Nebraska tax
-22-

LB401 LB401
2025 2025
return for a taxable year if, for such taxable year, the only source of
income derived from or connected with sources within this state for such
shareholder, or for the shareholder and the shareholder's spouse if a
joint federal income tax return is filed, is from one or more electing
small business corporations or electing partnerships as defined in
subdivision (7)(a) of section 77-2727 for such taxable year and such
nonresident individual shareholder's tax under the Nebraska Revenue Act
of 1967 would be fully satisfied by the credit allowed to such
shareholder under subdivision (g) of this subsection;
(f) If the amount calculated under subdivision (a) of this
subsection results in a net operating loss, such net operating loss may
not be carried forward to succeeding taxable years;
(g) A refundable credit shall be available to the shareholders in an
amount equal to their pro rata or distributive share of the Nebraska
income tax paid by the electing small business corporation. For tax
returns filed for taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2022, such credit shall be allowed for the same taxable year
for which the election is made, without regard to the year in which the
tax is paid to Nebraska or deducted on a federal income tax return; and
(h)(i) For tax years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2018, but prior to January 1, 2023, the electing small
business corporation shall must make the election under this subsection
on or after January 1, 2023, but before December 31, 2025, in the form
and manner prescribed by the Tax Commissioner for all years for which the
election under this subsection is made on behalf of the electing small
business corporation. The Tax Commissioner shall establish the form and
manner, which shall not include any changes to the past returns other
than those that are directly related to the election under this
subsection.
(ii) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if an electing
small business corporation files in the form and manner as specified in
-23-

LB401 LB401
2025 2025
subdivision (h)(i) of this subsection, the deadline for filing a claim
for credit or refund prescribed in section 77-2793 shall be extended for
affected shareholders of the electing small business corporation until
the timeframe specified in section 77-2793 or January 31, 2026, whichever
is later. The resulting claim of refund for tax years beginning prior to
January 1, 2023, shall be submitted in the form and manner as prescribed
by the Tax Commissioner. Neither the electing small business corporation
nor its shareholders shall incur any penalties for late filing nor owe
interest on such amounts. The Tax Commissioner shall not be required to
pay interest on any amounts owed to the shareholders resulting from such
refund claims.
(iii) Notwithstanding the dates provided in subdivision (h)(i) of
this subsection, the Tax Commissioner shall have one year from the date
an electing small business corporation files in the form and manner as
specified in subdivision (h)(i) of this subsection to review and make a
written proposed deficiency determination in accordance with section
77-2786. Any notice of deficiency determination made as specified in this
subdivision may be enforced at any time within six years from the date of
the notice of deficiency determination.
(9) For purposes of this section:
(a) Electing small business corporation means, with respect to a
taxable period, an eligible small business corporation having an election
in effect under subchapter S of the Internal Revenue Code that has made
an election pursuant to subsection (8) of this section with respect to
such taxable period; and
(b) Eligible small business corporation means an entity subject to
taxation under subchapter S of the Internal Revenue Code and the
regulations thereunder.
(10) For purposes of this section, any shareholder or member of the
corporation or limited liability company that is a grantor trust of a
nonresident shall be disregarded and this section shall apply as though
-24-

LB401 LB401
2025 2025
the nonresident grantor was the shareholder or member.
Sec. 5. Section 77-2776, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-2776 (1) As soon as practical after an income tax return is
filed, the Tax Commissioner shall examine it to determine the correct
amount of tax. If the Tax Commissioner finds that the amount of tax shown
on the return is less than the correct amount, he or she shall notify the
taxpayer of the amount of the deficiency proposed to be assessed. If the
Tax Commissioner finds that the tax paid is more than the correct amount,
he or she shall credit the overpayment against any taxes due by the
taxpayer and refund the difference. The Tax Commissioner shall, upon
request, make prompt assessment of taxes due as provided by the laws of
the United States for federal income tax purposes.
(2) If the taxpayer fails to file an income tax return, the Tax
Commissioner shall estimate the taxpayer's tax liability from any
available information and notify the taxpayer of the amount proposed to
be assessed as in the case of a deficiency.
(3) A notice of deficiency shall set forth the reason for the
proposed assessment or for the change in the amount of credit or loss to
be carried over to another year. The notice shall include a written
statement containing the details of the facts, circumstances, and reasons
the Tax Commissioner used to determine that the taxpayer did not report
the correct amount of tax. The notice may be mailed to the taxpayer at
his or her last-known address. In the case of a joint return, the notice
of deficiency may be a single joint notice, except that if the Tax
Commissioner is notified by either spouse that separate residences have
been established, the Tax Commissioner shall mail joint notices to each
spouse. If the taxpayer is deceased or under a legal disability, a notice
of deficiency may be mailed to his or her last-known address unless the
Tax Commissioner has received notice of the existence of a fiduciary
relationship with respect to such taxpayer.
-25-

LB401 LB401
2025 2025
(4) A notice of deficiency regarding an item of entity income may be
mailed to the entity at its last-known address or to the address of the
entity's tax matters person for federal income tax purposes. Such notice
shall be deemed to have been received by each partner, shareholder, or
member of such entity, but only for items of entity income reported by
the partner, shareholder, or member. The actions taken thereon on behalf
of the partnership, limited liability company, small business
corporation, estate, or trust are binding on the partners, members,
shareholders, or beneficiaries.
Sec. 6. Section 77-2786, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-2786 (1) Except as otherwise provided in the Nebraska Revenue Act
of 1967, a notice of a proposed deficiency determination shall be mailed
to the taxpayer within three years after the return was filed. Except as
otherwise provided in the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, no deficiency
shall be assessed or collected with respect to the year for which the
return was filed unless a notice of a proposed deficiency determination
is mailed within three years after the return was filed or the period
otherwise fixed. The notice of proposed deficiency determination shall
include a written statement containing the details of the facts,
circumstances, and reasons the Tax Commissioner used to determine that
the taxpayer did not report the correct amount of tax.
(2) If the taxpayer omits from Nebraska taxable income an amount
properly includable therein which is in excess of twenty-five percent of
the amount of taxable income stated in the return or a corporate return
omits a properly includable member of the unitary group as defined in
section 77-2734.04, a notice of a deficiency determination may be mailed
to the taxpayer within six years after the return was filed. A notice of
deficiency determination based on the omission of a member of a unitary
group shall be limited to the increase in the tax caused by including the
omitted member. For purposes of this subsection, there shall not be taken
-26-

LB401 LB401
2025 2025
into account any amount which is omitted in the return if such amount is
disclosed in the return, or in a statement attached to the return, in a
manner adequate to apprise the Tax Commissioner of the nature and amount
of such item and the manner in which such item would affect the
computation of Nebraska taxable income.
(3) If no return is filed or a false and fraudulent return is filed
with intent to evade the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act
of 1967, a notice of deficiency determination may be mailed to the
taxpayer at any time.
(4) If a taxpayer fails to comply with the requirement of section
77-2775 by not reporting a change or correction increasing his or her
federal adjusted gross income, taxable income, or tax liability or a
change or correction which is treated in the same manner as if it were a
deficiency determination for federal income tax purposes, or by not
reporting a change or correction in income taxable in or tax credit
allowable by any state to the extent required by the Tax Commissioner by
regulation, or in not filing an amended return, a notice of deficiency
determination based on a complete examination of the tax liability for
the tax years involved may be mailed to the taxpayer at any time.
(5) If the taxpayer, pursuant to section 77-2775, reports a federal
change or correction or a state change or correction, files an amended
return increasing his or her federal adjusted gross income, taxable
income, or tax liability, or reports a change or correction which is
treated in the same manner as if it were a deficiency for federal income
tax purposes, a notice of a deficiency determination based on a
redetermination of Nebraska tax liability to reflect the change or
correction may be mailed at any time within two years after such report
or amended return was filed.
(6) When, before the expiration of the time prescribed in this
section for the mailing of a notice of deficiency determination, both the
Tax Commissioner and the taxpayer have consented in writing to the
-27-

LB401 LB401
2025 2025
mailing after such time, the notice of deficiency determination may be
mailed at any time prior to the expiration of the period agreed upon. The
period so agreed may be extended by subsequent agreement in writing made
before the expiration of the period previously agreed upon.
An agreement between the taxpayer and the Internal Revenue Service
providing for the extension of the period for the mailing of a notice of
deficiency determination of federal income taxes shall constitute an
agreement with the Tax Commissioner to extend the period for assessment
of income taxes under the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 through the ending
date shown on the federal agreement. A copy of all such agreements and
extensions thereof shall be filed with the Tax Commissioner within thirty
days after their execution. If the copy of the extension agreement with
the Internal Revenue Service is not filed pursuant to this subsection,
the notice of deficiency determination for such taxable year may be
mailed at any time within one year of the discovery of the extension by
the Tax Commissioner.
(7) For purposes of this section, an income tax return filed before
the last day prescribed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 for the
filing thereof, determined without regard to any extension of time to
file the return, shall be deemed to be filed on such last day. If a
return or withholding tax for any period ending with or within a calendar
year is filed before April 15 of the succeeding calendar year, such
return shall be deemed to be filed on April 15 of such succeeding
calendar year.
(8) When it becomes necessary for the Tax Commissioner to apply for
a court order under subsection (2) of section 77-27,109 for the
production of books, papers, records, or memoranda or the testimony of
any person, the period for the mailing of a notice of deficiency
determination shall be tolled from the date the Tax Commissioner first
applies to the appropriate court for the order until the last date on
which the information or testimony contained in the application for the
-28-

LB401 LB401
2025 2025
court order is obtained by the Tax Commissioner.
This subsection shall not apply if the court finds that the
information is not relevant to the determination of the tax liability,
the information was provided prior to the filing of the application, or
the application was not filed within the time period otherwise provided
in this section for the mailing of a notice of deficiency determination.
(9) Any extension for an item of entity income that is signed on
behalf of the entity or by the entity's tax matters person for federal
income tax purposes shall extend the time period during which a notice of
deficiency could be mailed to the partners, shareholders, or members of
the entity with respect to any item of entity income.
Sec. 7. Section 77-2796, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-2796 If the Tax Commissioner disallows a claim for refund, he or
she shall notify the taxpayer accordingly. The notice shall include a
written statement containing the details of the facts, circumstances, and
reasons the Tax Commissioner used to determine that the taxpayer did not
make an overpayment. The action of the Tax Commissioner denying a claim
for refund is final upon the expiration of thirty days after the date
when he or she mails notice of his or her action to the taxpayer unless
within this period the taxpayer seeks review of the Tax Commissioner's
determination as hereinafter provided.
Sec. 8. Original sections 77-2709, 77-2786, and 77-2796, Reissue
Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 77-2708, 77-2727, 77-2734.01,
and 77-2776, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-29-